Missouri, session 2026, SB1381.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 211.031, 211.061, 211.063, 211.071,
and 211.141, RSMo, are repealed and five new sections enacted
in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 211.031, 211.061,
211.063, 211.071, and 211.141, to read as follows:
211.031. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, the juvenile court or the family court in circuits
that have a family court as provided in chapter 487 shall
have exclusive original jurisdiction in proceedings:
(1) Involving any child who may be a resident of or
found within the county and who is alleged to be in need of
care and treatment because:
(a) The parents, or other persons legally responsible
for the care and support of the child, neglect or refuse to
provide proper support, education which is required by law,
medical, surgical or other care necessary for his or her
well-being; except that reliance by a parent, guardian or
custodian upon remedial treatment other than medical or
surgical treatment for a child shall not be construed as
neglect when the treatment is recognized or permitted
pursuant to the laws of this state;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1381 2
(b) The child is otherwise without proper care,
custody or support;
(c) The child was living in a room, building or other
structure at the time such dwelling was found by a court of
competent jurisdiction to be a public nuisance pursuant to
section 195.130; or
(d) The child is in need of mental health or juvenile
court services and the parent, guardian or custodian is
unable to afford or access appropriate mental health
treatment or care for the child;
(2) Involving any child who may be a resident of or
found within the county and who is alleged to be in need of
care and treatment because:
(a) The child while subject to compulsory school
attendance is repeatedly and without justification absent
from school;
(b) The child disobeys the reasonable and lawful
directions of his or her parents or other custodian and is
beyond their control;
(c) The child is habitually absent from his or her
home without sufficient cause, permission, or justification;
(d) The behavior or associations of the child are
otherwise injurious to his or her welfare or to the welfare
of others; or
(e) The child is charged with an offense not
classified as criminal, or with an offense applicable only
to children; except that, the juvenile court shall not have
jurisdiction over any child fifteen years of age who is
alleged to have violated a state or municipal traffic
ordinance or regulation, the violation of which does not
constitute a dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061,
or any child who is alleged to have violated a state or

SB 1381 3
municipal ordinance or regulation prohibiting possession or
use of any tobacco product;
(3) Involving any child who is alleged to have
violated a state law or municipal ordinance, or any person
who is alleged to have violated a state law or municipal
ordinance prior to attaining the age of eighteen years, in
which cases jurisdiction [may] shall be taken by the court
of the circuit in which the violation is or violations are
alleged to have occurred, except as provided in subsection 2
of this section; except that, the juvenile court shall not
have jurisdiction over any child fifteen years of age who is
alleged to have violated a state or municipal traffic
ordinance or regulation, the violation of which does not
constitute a dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061,
and except that the juvenile court shall have concurrent
jurisdiction with the municipal court over any child who is
alleged to have violated a municipal curfew ordinance, and
except that the juvenile court shall have concurrent
jurisdiction with the circuit court on any child who is
alleged to have violated a state or municipal ordinance or
regulation prohibiting possession or use of any tobacco
product;
(4) For the adoption of a person;
(5) For the commitment of a child to the guardianship
of the department of social services as provided by law;
(6) Involving an order of protection pursuant to
chapter 455 when the respondent is less than eighteen years
of age; and
(7) Involving a child who has been a victim of sex
trafficking or sexual exploitation.

SB 1381 4
2. Transfer of a matter, proceeding, jurisdiction or
supervision for a child who resides in a county of this
state shall be made as follows:
(1) Prior to the filing of a petition and upon request
of any party or at the discretion of the juvenile officer,
the matter in the interest of a child may be transferred by
the juvenile officer, with the prior consent of the juvenile
officer of the receiving court, to the county of the child's
residence or the residence of the person eighteen years of
age for future action;
(2) Upon the motion of any party or on its own motion
prior to final disposition on the pending matter, the court
in which a proceeding is commenced may transfer the
proceeding of a child to the court located in the county of
the child's residence, or the county in which the offense
pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of this section
is alleged to have occurred for further action;
(3) Upon motion of any party or on its own motion, the
court in which jurisdiction has been taken pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section may at any time thereafter
transfer jurisdiction of a child to the court located in the
100 county of the child's residence for further action with the
101 prior consent of the receiving court;
102 (4) Upon motion of any party or upon its own motion at
103 any time following a judgment of disposition or treatment
104 pursuant to section 211.181, the court having jurisdiction
105 of the cause may place the child under the supervision of
106 another juvenile court within or without the state pursuant
107 to section 210.570 with the consent of the receiving court;
108 (5) Upon motion of any child or his or her parent, the
109 court having jurisdiction shall grant one change of judge
110 pursuant to Missouri supreme court rules;

SB 1381 5
111 (6) Upon the transfer of any matter, proceeding,
112 jurisdiction or supervision of a child, certified copies of
113 all legal and social documents and records pertaining to the
114 case on file with the clerk of the transferring juvenile
115 court shall accompany the transfer;
116 (7) Upon motion of the prosecuting or circuit attorney
117 where the alleged offense or offenses occurred to the court
118 of general jurisdiction to prosecute the alleged crime or
119 crimes under the general law, the court shall transfer
120 jurisdiction if it is alleged that the juvenile officer
121 failed to perform the proper risk and needs assessment
122 described under subsection 4 of section 211.141.
123 3. In any proceeding involving any child taken into
124 custody in a county other than the county of the child's
125 residence, the juvenile court of the county of the child's
126 residence shall be notified of such taking into custody
127 within seventy-two hours.
128 4. When an investigation by a juvenile officer
129 pursuant to this section reveals that the only basis for
130 action involves an alleged violation of section 167.031
131 involving a child who alleges to be receiving instruction at
132 a home school or an FPE school, the juvenile officer shall
133 contact a parent or parents of such child to verify that the
134 child is receiving instruction at such school and not in
135 violation of section 167.031 before making a report of such
136 a violation. Any report of a violation of section 167.031
137 made by a juvenile officer regarding a child who is
138 receiving instruction at a home school or an FPE school
139 shall be made to the prosecuting attorney of the county
140 where the child legally resides.
141 5. The disability or disease of a parent shall not
142 constitute a basis for a determination that a child is a

SB 1381 6
143 child in need of care or for the removal of custody of a
144 child from the parent without a specific showing that there
145 is a causal relation between the disability or disease and
146 harm to the child.
211.061. 1. When a child is taken into custody with
or without warrant for an offense, the child, together with
any information concerning the child and the personal
property found in the child's possession, shall be taken
immediately and directly before the juvenile court or
delivered to the juvenile officer or person acting for the
child.
2. If any person is taken before a circuit or
associate circuit judge not assigned to juvenile court or a
municipal judge, and it is then, or at any time thereafter,
ascertained that he or she was under the age of eighteen
years at the time he or she is alleged to have committed the
offense, or that he or she is subject to the jurisdiction of
the juvenile court as provided by this chapter, it is the
duty of the judge forthwith to transfer the case or refer
the matter to the juvenile court, and direct the delivery of
such person, together with information concerning him or her
and the personal property found in his or her possession, to
the juvenile officer or person acting as such.
3. When the juvenile court is informed that a child is
in detention it shall examine the reasons therefor,
including the risk and needs assessment described under
subsection 4 of section 211.141, and shall immediately:
(1) Order the child released; or
(2) Order the child continued in detention until a
detention hearing is held. An order to continue the child
in detention shall only be entered upon the filing of a
petition or motion to modify and a determination by the

SB 1381 7
court that probable cause exists to believe that the child
has committed acts specified in the petition or motion that
bring the child within the jurisdiction of the court under
subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031.
4. A juvenile shall not remain in detention for a
period greater than twenty-four hours unless the court
orders a detention hearing. If such hearing is not held
within three days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal
holidays, the juvenile shall be released from detention
unless the court for good cause orders the hearing
continued. The detention hearing shall be held within the
judicial circuit at a date, time and place convenient to the
court. Notice of the date, time and place of a detention
hearing, and of the right to counsel, shall be given to the
juvenile and his or her custodian in person, by telephone,
or by such other expeditious method as is available.
211.063. 1. A child accused of violating the
provisions of subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of section
211.031 shall not be held in a secure detention placement
for a period greater than twenty-four hours, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, unless the court
finds pursuant to a probable cause hearing held within that
twenty-four-hour period, that the child has violated the
conditions of a valid court order and that:
(1) The child has a record of willful failure to
appear at juvenile court proceedings; or
(2) The child has a record of violent conduct
resulting in physical injury to self or others; [or]
(3) The child has a record of leaving a court-ordered
placement, other than secure detention, without permission;
or

SB 1381 8
(4) The child has a record of repeated alleged
violations of state or municipal laws during the immediate
preceding sixty days that supports the good faith belief
that the child will continue to violate state or municipal
laws and will pose a risk to the safety and well-being of
others if released.
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Secure detention", any public or private
residential facility used for the temporary placement of any
child if such facility includes construction fixtures
designed to physically restrict the movements and activities
of children held in the lawful custody of such facility;
(2) "Valid court order", an order issued by a court of
competent jurisdiction regarding a child who has been
brought before the court, which sets forth specific
conditions of behavior for the child and consequences of
violations of such conditions.
3. This section shall not apply:
(1) To a child who has been taken under the
jurisdiction of the court pursuant to subdivision (3) of
subsection 1 of section 211.031; or
(2) To a child who was adjudicated pursuant to
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031 after
being taken under the jurisdiction of the court; or
(3) To a child who is currently charged with a
violation under subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section
211.031.
211.071. 1. If a petition or motion to modify alleges
that a child between the ages of fourteen and eighteen has
committed an offense that would be considered a felony if
committed by an adult, the court may, upon its own motion or
upon motion by the prosecuting or circuit attorney, juvenile

SB 1381 9
officer, the child, or the child's custodian, order a
hearing and may, in its discretion, dismiss the petition or
motion to modify and such child may be transferred to the
court of general jurisdiction and prosecuted under the
general law; except that, if a petition alleges that a child
between the ages of twelve and eighteen has committed an
offense that would be considered first degree murder under
section 565.020, second degree murder under section 565.021,
first degree assault under section 565.050, forcible rape
under section 566.030 as it existed prior to August 28,
2013, rape in the first degree under section 566.030,
forcible sodomy under section 566.060 as it existed prior to
August 28, 2013, sodomy in the first degree under section
566.060, first degree robbery under section 569.020 as it
existed prior to January 1, 2017, robbery in the first
degree under section 570.023, distribution of drugs under
section 195.211 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or
the manufacturing of a controlled substance under section
579.055, if committed by an adult, or a dangerous felony as
defined in section 556.061, or any felony involving the use,
assistance, or aid of a deadly weapon, or has committed two
or more prior unrelated offenses that would be felonies if
committed by an adult, the court shall order a hearing, and
may, in its discretion, dismiss the petition or motion to
modify and transfer the child to a court of general
jurisdiction for prosecution under the general law.
2. Upon apprehension and arrest, jurisdiction over the
criminal offense or offenses allegedly committed by any
person between eighteen and twenty-one years of age over
whom the juvenile court has retained continuing jurisdiction
shall automatically terminate and that offense shall be

SB 1381 10
dealt with in the court of general jurisdiction as provided
in section 211.041.
3. Knowing and willful age misrepresentation by a
juvenile subject shall not affect any action or proceeding
which occurs based upon the misrepresentation. Any evidence
obtained during the period of time in which a child
misrepresents his or her age may be used against the child
and will be subject only to rules of evidence applicable in
adult proceedings.
4. Written notification of a transfer hearing shall be
given to the juvenile and his or her custodian in the same
manner as provided in sections 211.101 and 211.111. Notice
of the hearing may be waived by the custodian. Notice shall
contain a statement that the purpose of the hearing is to
determine whether the child is a proper subject to be dealt
with under the provisions of this chapter, and that if the
court finds that the child is not a proper subject to be
dealt with under the provisions of this chapter, the
petition or motion to modify will be dismissed to allow for
prosecution of the child under the general law.
5. The juvenile officer may consult with the office of
prosecuting attorney concerning any offense for which the
child could be certified as an adult under this section.
The prosecuting or circuit attorney shall have access to
police reports, reports of the juvenile or deputy juvenile
officer, statements of witnesses and all other records or
reports relating to the offense alleged to have been
committed by the child. The prosecuting or circuit attorney
shall have access to the disposition records of the child
when the child has been adjudicated pursuant to subdivision
(3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031. The prosecuting
attorney shall not divulge any information regarding the

SB 1381 11
child and the offense until the juvenile court at a judicial
hearing has determined that the child is not a proper
subject to be dealt with under the provisions of this
chapter. The prosecuting or circuit attorney may make a
motion to transfer the matter to the court of general
jurisdiction where the alleged offense or offenses occurred
to prosecute the alleged offense or offenses if it is
alleged that the juvenile officer failed to perform the risk
and needs assessment described under subsection 4 of section
211.141.
6. A written report shall be prepared in accordance
with this chapter developing fully all available information
relevant to the criteria which shall be considered by the
court in determining whether the child is a proper subject
to be dealt with under the provisions of this chapter and
whether there are reasonable prospects of rehabilitation
within the juvenile justice system. These criteria shall
include but not be limited to:
(1) The seriousness of the offense alleged and whether
the protection of the community requires transfer to the
court of general jurisdiction;
(2) Whether the offense alleged involved viciousness,
force and violence;
(3) Whether the offense alleged was against persons or
property with greater weight being given to the offense
against persons, especially if personal injury resulted;
(4) Whether the offense alleged is a part of a
repetitive pattern of offenses which indicates that the
child may be beyond rehabilitation under the juvenile code;
(5) The record and history of the child, including
experience with the juvenile justice system, other courts,

SB 1381 12
100 supervision, commitments to juvenile institutions and other
101 placements;
102 (6) The sophistication and maturity of the child as
103 determined by consideration of his or her home and
104 environmental situation, emotional condition and pattern of
105 living;
106 (7) The age of the child;
107 (8) The program and facilities available to the
108 juvenile court in considering disposition;
109 (9) Whether or not the child can benefit from the
110 treatment or rehabilitative programs available to the
111 juvenile court; and
112 (10) Racial disparity in certification.
113 7. If the court dismisses the petition to permit the
114 child to be prosecuted under the general law, the court
115 shall enter a dismissal order containing:
116 (1) Findings showing that the court had jurisdiction
117 of the cause and of the parties;
118 (2) Findings showing that the child was represented by
119 counsel;
120 (3) Findings showing that the hearing was held in the
121 presence of the child and his or her counsel; and
122 (4) Findings showing the reasons underlying the
123 court's decision to transfer jurisdiction.
124 8. A copy of the petition or motion to modify and
125 order of the dismissal shall be sent to the prosecuting
126 attorney.
127 9. When a petition or motion to modify has been
128 dismissed thereby permitting a child to be prosecuted under
129 the general law and the prosecution of the child results in
130 a conviction, the jurisdiction of the juvenile court over
131 that child is forever terminated, except as provided in

SB 1381 13
132 subsection 10 of this section, for an act that would be a
133 violation of a state law or municipal ordinance.
134 10. If a petition or motion to modify has been
135 dismissed thereby permitting a child to be prosecuted under
136 the general law and the child is found not guilty by a court
137 of general jurisdiction, the juvenile court shall have
138 jurisdiction over any later offense committed by that child
139 which would be considered a misdemeanor or felony if
140 committed by an adult, subject to the certification
141 provisions of this section.
142 11. If the court does not dismiss the petition or
143 motion to modify to permit the child to be prosecuted under
144 the general law, it shall set a date for the hearing upon
145 the petition as provided in section 211.171.
211.141. 1. When a child is taken into custody as
provided in section 211.131, the person taking the child
into custody shall, unless it has been otherwise ordered by
the court, return the child to his or her parent, guardian
or legal custodian on the promise of such person to bring
the child to court, if necessary, at a stated time or at
such times as the court may direct. The court may also
impose other conditions relating to activities of the
child. If these additional conditions are not met, the
court may order the child detained as provided in section
211.151. If additional conditions are imposed, the child
shall be notified that failure to adhere to the conditions
may result in the court imposing more restrictive conditions
or ordering the detention of the child. If the person
taking the child into custody believes it desirable, he may
request the parent, guardian or legal custodian to sign a
written promise to bring the child into court and
acknowledging any additional conditions imposed on the child.

SB 1381 14
2. If the child is not released as provided in
subsection 1 of this section, he or she may be conditionally
released or detained in any place of detention specified in
section 211.151 but only on order of the court specifying
the reason for the conditional release or the detention.
The parent, guardian or legal custodian of the child shall
be notified of the terms of the conditional release or the
place of detention as soon as possible.
3. The juvenile officer may conditionally release or
detain a child for a period not to exceed twenty-four hours
if it is impractical to obtain a written order from the
court because of the unreasonableness of the hour or the
fact that it is a Sunday or holiday. The conditional
release shall be as provided in subsection 1 of this
section, and the detention shall be as provided in section
211.151. A written record of such conditional release or
detention shall be kept and a report in writing filed with
the court. In the event that the judge is absent from his
circuit, or is unable to act, the approval of another
circuit judge of the same or adjoining circuit must be
obtained as a condition or continuing the conditional
release or detention of a child for more than twenty-four
hours.
4. In any matter referred to the juvenile court
pursuant to section 211.031, the juvenile officer shall make
a risk and needs assessment of the child and, before the
disposition of the matter, shall report the results of the
assessment to the juvenile court. The juvenile officer
shall use a cumulative total of points assessed for all
alleged offenses committed by the child, as well as all
alleged offenses committed by the child within the previous
sixty days, to determine whether or not the juvenile court

SB 1381 15
shall order the child to be detained as provided in section
211.151. If a juvenile officer fails to strictly abide by
the provisions of this section in assessing the risks and
needs of the child, the prosecuting or circuit attorney in
the jurisdiction in which the child is alleged to have
committed the offense or offenses shall have the authority
to make a motion to transfer the case or cases involving the
child to the court of general jurisdiction and to prosecute
the case or cases under general law. The assessment shall
be written on a standardized form approved by the office of
state courts administrator.
5. The division, in cooperation with juvenile officers
and juvenile courts, shall at least biennially review a
random sample of assessments of children and the disposition
of each child's case to recommend assessment and disposition
equity throughout the state. Such review shall identify any
evidence of racial disparity in certification. Such review
shall be conducted in a manner which protects the
confidentiality of the cases examined.
✓